New York, session 2025-2026, S7935.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 186 of the general municipal law, 2 as amended by chapter 531 of the laws of 2011, is amended and a new 3 subdivision 3-f is added to read as follows: 4 3. "Games of chance" shall mean and include only the games known as 5 "merchandise wheels", "bunco", "coin boards", "merchandise boards", 6 "seal cards", "event games", "raffles", and "bell jars" and such other 7 specific games as may be authorized by the board, in which prizes are 8 awarded on the basis of a designated winning number or numbers, color or 9 colors, symbol or symbols determined by chance, but not including games 10 commonly known as "bingo or lotto" which are controlled under article 11 fourteen-H of this chapter and also not including "bookmaking", "policy 12 or numbers games" and "lottery" as defined in section 225.00 of the 13 penal law. [No game of chance shall involve wagering of money by one 14 player against another player.] 15 3-f. "Bunco" shall mean a game where players roll multiple dice in an 16 attempt to roll the number corresponding to the round number. The number 17 of games, rounds and players can vary. Players are divided into teams 18 which compete against each other, either based on the number of rounds 19 won or the total number of matches they roll throughout the game. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11838-01-5